Maryland, session 2026, HB0201.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–207.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0201*

HOUSE BILL 201
(a) To the extent included in federal adjusted gross income, the amounts under
this section are subtracted from the federal adjusted gross income of a resident to determine
Maryland adjusted gross income.
(RR) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “FOOD SERVICE FACILITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
21–301 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(III) “HOTEL” MEANS AN ESTABLISHMENT THAT OFFERS
SLEEPING ACCOMMODATIONS FOR COMPENSATION.
(IV) “PROVIDING PASSENGER–FOR–HIRE SERVICES” MEANS
PROVIDING LIMOUSINE SERVICES, SEDAN SERVICES, OR TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK SERVICES IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 10 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES
ARTICLE.
(V) “PROVIDING TAXICAB SERVICES” MEANS PROVIDING
TAXICAB SERVICES IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 10 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES
ARTICLE.
(2) THE SUBTRACTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
INCLUDES ANY COMPENSATION RECEIVED IN THE FORM OF A TIP OR GRATUITY FOR:
(I) EMPLOYMENT IN A FOOD SERVICE FACILITY;
(II) EMPLOYMENT IN A BUSINESS LICENSED FOR ON–SALE
CONSUMPTION OF AN ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND CANNABIS ARTICLE;
(III) EMPLOYMENT IN A HOTEL;
(IV) PROVIDING PASSENGER–FOR–HIRE SERVICES; OR
(V) PROVIDING TAXICAB SERVICES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.